Utah statutes.
58-40-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  An applicant for licensure under this chapter shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Subsection 63-38-3(2); and

(c)  be of good moral character.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), an applicant for licensure as a master therapeutic recreation specialist under this chapter shall as defined by division rule:

(a)  complete an approved graduate degree;

(b)  complete 4,000 qualifying hours of paid experience as:

(i)  a licensed therapeutic recreation specialist if completed in the state; or

(ii)  a certified therapeutic recreation specialist certified by the National Council for Therapeutic Recreation Certification if completed outside of the state; and

(c)  pass an approved examination.

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), an applicant for licensure as a therapeutic recreation specialist under this chapter shall, as defined by division rule:

(a)  complete an approved:

(i)  bachelor's degree in therapeutic recreation or recreational therapy;

(ii)  bachelor's degree with an approved emphasis, option, or concentration in therapeutic recreation or recreational therapy; or

(iii)  graduate degree;

(b)  complete an approved practicum; and

(c)  pass an approved examination.

(4)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), an applicant for licensure as a therapeutic recreation technician under this chapter shall, as defined by division rule:

(a)  have a high school diploma or GED equivalent;

(b)  complete an approved:

(i)  educational course in therapeutic recreation taught by a licensed master therapeutic recreation specialist; or

(ii)  six semester hours or nine quarter hours in therapeutic recreation or recreational therapy from an accredited college or university;

(c)  complete an approved practicum under the supervision of:

(i)  a licensed master therapeutic recreation specialist; or

(ii)  an on-site, full-time, employed therapeutic recreation specialist; and

(d)  pass an approved examination.

